fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Base-ball et softball > Équipement de protection de base-ball et softball: Casques de batteurs de base-ball et de softball; Plastrons de receveurs; Coudières de baseball et de softball; Masques de joueur de champ de baseball et de softball; Protège-mains et protège-poignets de baseball et de softball; Jambières de base-ball et de softball; Mitaines de glissade de baseball et de softball; Panoplies d'équipement de receveurs; Accessoires de casques et de masques de receveurs; Casques et masques de receveurs; Accessoires de protège-jambes
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Baseball in softball > Zaščitna oprema za baseball in softball: Zaščitne čelade za odbijanje za baseball in softball; Ščitniki za prsni koš za baseball in softball; Baseball in Softball Ščitniki za komolce; Baseball in Softball Maske za zunanje člane ekipe; Ščitniki za roke in zapestja za baseball in softball; Ščitniki za noge za baseball in softball; Baseball in Softball Rokavice za drsenje; Kompleti opreme za lovilce; Dodatki za čelado in masko za lovilce; Čelade in maske za lovilce; Dodatki za ščitnike za noge
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Beisbolas ir softbolas > Beisbolo ir softbolo apsauginės priemonės: Beisbolo ir softbolo mušėjo šalmai; Beisbolo ir softbolo krūtinės apsaugos; Beisbolo ir softbolo alkūnių apsaugos; Beisbolo ir softbolo gynėjų kaukės; Beisbolo ir softbolo rankų ir riešų apsaugos; Beisbolo ir softbolo kojų apsaugos; Beisbolo ir softbolo slydimo pirštinės; Gaudytojo įrangos rinkiniai; Gaudytojų šalmų ir kaukių priedai; Gaudytojo šalmai ir kaukės; Kojų apsaugų priedai
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Baseball & Softball > Baseball & Softball Protective Gear: Baseball & Softball Batting Helmets; Baseball & Softball Chest Protectors; Baseball & Softball Elbow Guards; Baseball & Softball Fielder Masks; Baseball & Softball Hand & Wrist Guards; Baseball & Softball Leg Guards; Baseball & Softball Sliding Mitts; Catchers Equipment Sets; Catchers Helmet & Mask Accessories; Catchers Helmets & Masks; Leg Guard Accessories
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Baseball i softball > Odzież ochronna do baseballa i softballa: Kaski dla pałkarzy; Ochraniacze tułowia do baseballa i softballa; Ochraniacze na łokcie do baseballu i softballu; Maski dla polowych do baseballu i softballu; Ochraniacze dłoni i nadgarstków do baseballu i softballu; Ochraniacze nóg do baseballa i softballa; Rękawice do wślizgów do baseballu i softballu; Zestawy akcesoriów dla łapacza; Akcesoria do kasków i masek dla łapaczy; Kaski i maski dla łapacza; Akcesoria do ochraniaczy na nogi
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng chày & Bóng mềm > Găng đeo bảo vệ Bóng chày & Bóng mềm: Mũ bảo hiểm bóng chày và bóng mềm; Giáp ngực bóng chày & bóng mềm; Băng bảo vệ khuỷu tay chơi bóng chày và bóng mềm; Mặt nạ cho người bắt bóng ngoài sân bóng chày và bóng mềm; Băng bảo vệ bàn tay và cổ tay chơi bóng chày và bóng mềm; Ốp chân bóng chày & bóng mềm; Găng tay trượt bóng chày và bóng mềm; Bộ dụng cụ cho người bắt bóng; Phụ kiện mũ bảo hiểm và mặt nạ bắt bóng; Mũ và mặt nạ bảo hiểm cho người bắt bóng; Phụ kiện ốp bảo vệ chân
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Baseball și softball > Echipament de protecție pentru baseball și softball: Căști de baseball și softball; Protecții pentru piept pentru baseball și softball; Cotiere pentru baseball și softball; Măști de teren pentru baseball și softball; Protecții pentru mână și încheietură pentru baseball și softball; Protecții pentru picioare pentru baseball și softball; Mănuși de alunecare pentru baseball și softball; Seturi de echipamente pentru prindere; Accesorii pentru masca și casca de catcher; Căști și măști pentru prindere; Accesorii pentru apărători de picioare
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Baseball ja softball > Baseball- ja softball-suojat: Baseball- ja softball-lyöntikypärät; Baseball- ja softball-rintasuojukset; Baseballin ja softballin kyynärsuojat; Baseballin ja softballin ulkopelaajan maskit; Baseballin ja softballin käsi- ja rannesuojat; Baseball- ja softball-jalkasuojat; Baseballin ja softballin liukuräpylät; Siepparin välinesetit; Siepparin kypärien ja maskien lisävarusteet; Siepparin kypärät ja maskit; Jalkasuojien lisävarusteet
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 棒球/垒球用品 > 棒球/垒球护具: 棒球和垒球头盔; 棒球/垒球胸/背护具; 棒垒球护肘; 棒垒球野手面罩; 棒垒球护手与护腕; 棒球/垒球腿部护具; 棒垒球滑垒手套; 接球手护具套装; 捕手头盔和面罩配件; 接球手头盔; 护腿配件
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Béisbol y sóftbol > Equipamiento protector para béisbol y sóftbol: Cascos de béisbol y softball; Protectores de pecho para béisbol y sóftbol; Coderas para béisbol y sóftbol; Máscaras de fildeador para béisbol y sóftbol; Protectores de manos y muñecas para béisbol y sóftbol; Espinilleras para béisbol y sóftbol; Manoplas de deslizamiento para béisbol y sóftbol; Equipamiento para receptores; Accesorios para cascos y máscaras de receptor; Cascos y máscaras para receptores; Accesorios para espinilleras
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Baseball e softball > Protezioni per baseball e softball: Caschi da battitore per baseball e softball; Protezioni per il petto per baseball e softball; Gomitiere da baseball e softball; Maschere da difensore da baseball e softball; Protezioni per mani e polsi da baseball e softball; Protezioni per le gambe per baseball e softball; Guantoni da scivolata da baseball e softball; Set di attrezzature per catcher; Accessori per caschi e maschere da ricevitore; Caschi e maschere per catcher; Accessori per schinieri
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Baseball és softball > Baseball és softball védőfelszerelés: Baseball és softball sisakok; Baseball és softball mellvédők; Baseball és softball könyökvédők; Baseball és softball mezőnyjátékos maszkok; Baseball és softball kéz- és csuklóvédők; Baseball és softball lábvédők; Baseball és softball csúszókesztyűk; Fogófelszerelés-készletek; Elkapósisak- és maszk-kiegészítők; Fogósisakok és -maszkok; Lábvédő-kiegészítők
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Honkbal en softbal > Beschermende uitrusting voor honkbal en softbal: Slaghelmen voor honkbal en softbal; Borstbeschermers voor honkbal en softbal; Elleboogbeschermers voor honkbal en softbal; Veldmaskers voor honkbal en softbal; Hand- en polsbeschermers voor honkbal en softbal; Beenbeschermers voor honkbal en softbal; Slidinghandschoenen voor honkbal en softbal; Uitrusting voor catchers; Accessoires voor helmen en maskers van catchers; Helmen en maskers voor catchers; Accessoires voor beenbeschermers
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Mπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ: Κράνη για τον χειριστή ροπάλου μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Προστατευτικά θώρακα μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Επιαγκωνίδες μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Μάσκες fielder μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Προστατευτικά χεριών και καρπών μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Προστατευτικά ποδιών μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Γάντια ολίσθησης μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Σετ εξοπλισμού για κάτσερ; Αξεσουάρ κρανών & μασκών για catcher; Κράνη & μάσκες για κάτσερ; Αξεσουάρ προστατευτικών ποδιών
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Baseball og softball > Beskyttelsesutstyr for baseball og softball: Hjelmer for baseball og softball; Brystbeskyttere for baseball og softball; Albuebeskyttere for baseball og softball; Fielder-masker for baseball og softball; Hånd- og håndleddsbeskyttere for baseball og softball; Benbeskyttere for baseball og softball; Sklihansker for baseball og softball; Utstyrssett for stoppere; Tilbehør til hjelm og maske for catcher; Hjelmer og masker for stoppere; Tilbehør til leggbeskyttere
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бейзбол и софтбол > Защитна екипировка за бейзбол и софтбол: Каски за батиране при бейзбол и софтбол; Протектори за гръдния кош за бейзбол и софтбол; Налакътници за бейзбол и софтбол; Маски за бейзболни и софтболни полеви играчи; Протектори за ръце и китки за бейзбол и софтбол; Предпазители за крака за бейзбол и софтбол; Ръкавици за плъзгане за бейзбол и софтбол; Комплекти оборудване за кетчъри; Аксесоари за каски и маски за кетчъри; Каски и маски за кетчъри; Аксесоари за предпазители за крака
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Beyzbol ve Softbol > Beyzbol ve Softbol Koruyucu Kıyafetleri: Beyzbol ve Softbol Vuruş Kaskları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Göğüs Koruyucuları; Beyzbol ve softbol dirseklikleri; Beyzbol ve softbol alan oyuncusu maskeleri; Beyzbol ve softbol el ve bilek korumaları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Bacak Koruyucuları; Beyzbol ve softbol kayma eldivenleri; Yakalayıcı Malzeme Setleri; Yakalayıcı kaskı ve maskesi aksesuarları; Yakalayıcı Kaskları ve Maskeleri; Bacak koruyucu aksesuarları
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Baseball a softball > Ochranné vybavení na baseball a softball: Pálkařské přilby na baseball a softball; Chrániče hrudi na baseball a softball; Chrániče loktů na baseball a softball; Masky pro polaře na baseball a softball; Chrániče rukou a zápěstí na baseball a softball; Chrániče nohou na baseball a softball; Skluzové rukavice na baseball a softball; Sady vybavení pro chytače; Příslušenství k helmám a maskám pro chytače; Přilby a masky pro chytače; Příslušenství k chráničům nohou
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Bejzbal a softbal > Baseballové a softbalové ochranné pomôcky: Baseballové a softbalové prilby pre odpaľovača; Bejzbalové a softbalové chrániče hrudníka; Baseballové a softbalové chrániče laktí; Bejzbalové a softbalové masky; Chrániče rúk a zápästí na bejzbal a softbal; Baseballové a softbalové chrániče nôh; Bejzbalové a softbalové rukavice; Súpravy vybavenia pre chytačov; Príslušenstvo k prilbám a maskám chytačov; Prilby a masky pre chytačov; Príslušenstvo k chráničom nôh
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бейсбол и софтбол > Защитная экипировка для бейсбола и софтбола: Шлемы бэттера для бейсбола и софтбола; Нагрудники для бейсбола и софтбола; Налокотники для бейсбола и софтбола; Маски филдеров для бейсбола и софтбола; Защита кистей и запястий для бейсбола и софтбола; Щитки для бейсбола и софтбола; Рукавицы для слайдинга (бейсбол и софтбол); Комплекты экипировки для кетчеров; Аксессуары для шлемов и масок кетчера; Шлемы и маски для кетчеров; Аксессуары для защиты ног
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Bejzbol i softbol > Zaštitna oprema za bejzbol i softbol: Kacige za bejzbol i softbol; Štitnici za prsa za bejzbol i softbol; Štitnici za laktove za bejzbol i softbol; Maske za igrače za bejzbol i softbol; Štitnici za ruke i zglobove za bejzbol i softbol; Štitnici za noge za bejzbol i softbol; Klizne rukavice za bejzbol i softbol; Setovi opreme za hvatače; Dodaci za kacige i maske za hvatače; Kacige i maske za hvatače; Dodaci za štitnike za noge
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 棒球和壘球 > 棒壘球護具: 棒壘球打擊帽; 棒壘球護胸用具; 棒壘球護肘; 棒壘球野手面罩; 棒壘球護手與護腕; 棒壘球護腿板; 棒壘球滑壘手套; 捕手裝備組; 捕手頭盔與面罩配件; 捕手頭盔/面罩; 護腿配件
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Baseball & Softball > Baseball- & Softball-Schutzkleidung: Baseball- & Softballhelme; Baseball- & Softball-Brustpanzer; Ellenbogenschützer für Baseball & Softball; Fielder-Masken für Baseball & Softball; Hand- & Handgelenkschützer für Baseball & Softball; Baseball- & Softball-Knie- & Schienbeinschoner; Sliding-Handschuhe für Baseball & Softball; Ausrüstung für Fänger; Zubehör für Catcher-Helme & -Masken; Schutzhelme für Fänger; Zubehör für Beinschoner
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Beisebol e softbol > Equipamento de proteção para beisebol e softbol: Capacete de rebatedor de beisebol e softball; Protetores peitorais para beisebol e softbol; Cotoveleiras para beisebol e softbol; Máscaras de defensor para beisebol e softbol; Protetores de mão e pulso para beisebol e softbol; Caneleiras para beisebol e softbol; Luvas de deslizamento para beisebol e softbol; Conjuntos de equipamento para apanhadores; Acessórios para capacetes e máscaras de catcher; Capacetes e máscaras para apanhadores; Acessórios para caneleiras
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล: หมวกกีฬาเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ที่ป้องกันหน้าอกของเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; สนับศอกเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; หน้ากากฟีลเดอร์เบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ที่ป้องกันมือและข้อมือเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ที่ป้องกันขาของเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ถุงมือสไลด์ดิ้งเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ชุดอุปกรณ์ของผู้รับลูก; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับหมวกกันน็อกและหน้ากากแคตเชอร์; หมวกและหน้ากากของผู้รับลูก; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสนับแข้ง
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 野球・ソフトボール用品 > 野球・ソフトボール用プロテクター: 野球・ソフトボール用ヘルメット; 野球・ソフトボール用胸部保護パット; 野球・ソフトボール用エルボーガード; 野球・ソフトボール用フィールダーマスク; 野球・ソフトボール用ハンド・リストガード; 野球・ソフトボール用レッグガード; 野球・ソフトボール用スライディングミット; キャッチャー防具セット; キャッチャー用ヘルメット＆マスクアクセサリー; キャッチャーマスク; レッグガードアクセサリー
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basebol e softbol > Equipamento de proteção para basebol e softbol: Capacetes de rebatida para basebol e softbol; Protetores de peito para basebol e softbol; Cotoveleiras para basebol e softbol; Máscaras de defesa para basebol e softbol; Proteções de mãos e pulsos para basebol e softbol; Proteções de pernas para basebol e softbol; Luvas de deslizamento de basebol e softbol; Conjuntos de equipamento para apanhadores; Acessórios para capacetes e máscaras de recetor; Máscaras e capacetes para apanhadores; Acessórios para caneleiras
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 야구/소프트볼 > 야구/소프트볼 보호 장비: 야구/소프트볼 타자용 헬멧; 야구/소프트볼 가슴 보호대; 야구 및 소프트볼 팔꿈치 보호대; 야구 및 소프트볼 야수 마스크; 야구 및 소프트볼 손 및 손목 보호대; 야구/소프트볼 다리 보호대; 야구 및 소프트볼 슬라이딩 미트; 포수용 장비 세트; 포수 헬멧 및 마스크 액세서리; 포수용 헬멧/마스크; 레그 가드 액세서리
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Baseball och softball > Skyddsutrustning för baseball och softball: Slagmanshjälmar för baseball och softball; Baseball- och softballbröstskydd; Armbågsskydd för baseboll och softboll; Fältmasker för baseboll och softboll; Hand- och handledsskydd för baseboll och softboll; Baseball- och softballbenskydd; Glidhandskar för baseboll och softboll; Utrustning för mottagare; Tillbehör för hjälm och mask för catcher; Hjälmar och masker för mottagare; Tillbehör för benskydd
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Baseball og softball > Beskyttelsesudstyr til baseball og softball: Batterhjelme; Brystbeskyttelse til baseball og softball; Albuebeskyttere til baseball og softball; Markspillermasker til baseball og softball; Hånd- og håndledsbeskyttere til baseball og softball; Benbeskyttere til baseball og softball; Slidinghandsker til baseball og softball; Udstyrssæt til gribere; Tilbehør til hjelme og masker til catchere; Hjelme og masker til gribere; Tilbehør til benbeskyttere